District of Columbia statutes.
1-1326

Wall extending over lot line.

If the wall of any house already erected cover 7 inches or more in width of the adjoining lot, it shall be deemed a party wall, according to the regulations for building in the District, and the ground so occupied more than 7 inches in width shall be paid for as provided in § 1-1325.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1426, ch. 854, § 1587
This section is referenced in § 1-1327.
1981 Ed., § 1-926.
1973 Ed., § 1-626.